src/fst/test/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-kiskiswew_gt-norm.yaml
## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisoyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisoyêk

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisotân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-kîskisotakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-kîskison # LOCAL DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-kîskisonâwâw

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-kîskisotin # LOCAL INVERSE
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-kîskisotinâwâw
